Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6013.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-13-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-13 entitled "Public
Service Corporation Tax" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-13-4. Rate of taxation.
The tax imposed will be at the following rates:
(1) In the case of every corporation whose principal business is a steamboat or ferryboat
business as a common carrier, every common carrier steam or electric railroad corporation, every
street railway corporation, every common carrier dining, sleeping, chair, or parlor car corporation,
every corporation whose principal business is selling and distributing water to the public, and every
toll bridge corporation, one and one-fourth percent (1.25%) of its gross earnings;
(2) In the case of every corporation whose principal business is manufacturing, selling,
distributing and/or transmitting currents of electricity to be used for light, heat, or motive power,
four percent (4%) of its gross earnings, but deductions shall be made of gross earnings from the
transmission or sale of electricity to other public utility corporations, non-regulated power
producers, or municipal utilities for resale, whether within or outside of this state; provided, that
the tax measured by the portion of the utility’s gross earnings as is derived from the manufacture
and sale of illuminating and heating gas and its by-products and the merchandising of gas
appliances shall be computed at the rate of three percent (3%); Notwithstanding the above, on and
after January 1, 2026, the rate of tax set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall be suspended
until January 1, 2035;

(3) In the case of every express corporation carrying on its business on steamboats, steam
or electric railroads, or street railways and of every public service corporation whose principal
business is that of a telegraph corporation, four percent (4%) of its gross earnings;
(4) In the case of every telecommunications corporation providing telecommunications
service, ten percent (10%) of its gross earnings; provided, that the rate shall be nine percent (9%)
effective July 1, 1985, eight percent (8%) effective July 1, 1986, seven percent (7%) effective July
1, 1987, six percent (6%) effective July 1, 1988, and five percent (5%) effective July 1, 1997. For
purposes of this chapter, “telecommunications service” means the transmission of any interactive
two-way electromagnetic communications including voice, image, data, and other information, by
means of wire, cable, including fiber optical cable, microwave, and radio wave, or any
combinations of these media. This definition does not include value added non-voice services in
which computer processing applications are used to act on the form, content, code, and protocol of
the information to be transmitted;
(5) In the case of every public service cable corporation, eight percent (8%) of its gross
earnings;
(6) In the case of every corporation whose principal business is manufacturing, selling
and/or distributing to the public illuminating or heating gas, three percent (3%) of its gross earnings.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC002010
========
LC002010 - Page 2 of 3